trunk/apertium-br-fr/apertium-br-fr.br.dix
    <pardef n="ti__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ez</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>	  
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="f/orc’h__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orc’h</l>
          <r>orc’h<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erc’hier</l>
          <r>orc’h<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="buoc’h__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>saout</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>enned</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="muenn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>	

    <pardef n="kluj/ar__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iri</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mou/alc’h__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alc’h</l>
          <r>alc’h<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilc’hi</l>
          <r>alc’h<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
	
    <pardef n="/ael__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ael</l>
          <r>ael<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aelez</l>
          <r>ael<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>aeled</l>
          <r>ael<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	  </pardef>
	
    <pardef n="gwr/eg__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eg</l>
          <r>eg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agez</l>
          <r>eg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kr/aou__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aou</l>
          <r>aou<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evier</l>
          <r>aou<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bot/ez__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ez</l>
          <r>ez<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>où</l>
          <r>ez<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/arar__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arar</l>
          <r>arar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erer</l>
          <r>arar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="k/ar__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erent</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="d/añvad__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>añvad</l>
          <r>añvad<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eñved</l>
          <r>añvad<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="k/azeg__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>azeg</l>
          <r>azeg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ezekenned</l>
          <r>azeg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="b/azh__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>azh</l>
          <r>azh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>izhier</l>
          <r>azh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/gar__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gar</l>
          <r>gar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>garoù</l>
          <r>gar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <par n="initial-d__null"/>
        <p>
          <l>ivesker</l>
          <r>gar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
	  <par n="initial-d__null"/>
        <p>
          <l>ivc’har</l>
          <r>gar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pl/anken__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anken</l>
          <r>anken<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enk</l>
          <r>anken<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aotro/u__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>nez</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unez</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	  <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>uien</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="g/avr__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>avr</l>
          <r>avr<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ivri</l>
          <r>avr<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="goul/ou__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ou</l>
          <r>ou<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eier</l>
          <r>ou<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="m/atezh__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atezh</l>
          <r>atezh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itizhien</l>
          <r>atezh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>itizhion</l>
          <r>atezh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	  </pardef>

    <pardef n="m/anac’h__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anac’h</l>
          <r>anac’h<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enec’h</l>
          <r>anac’h<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kel/où__n">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ou</l>
          <r>où<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>où</l>
          <r>où<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eier</l>
          <r>où<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

	<e lm="bragoù jean"><par n="initial-b"/><i>rag</i><par n="kel/où__n"/><p><l><b/>jean</l><r><g><b/>jean</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="gouloù"><par n="initial-g"/><i>oul</i><par n="kel/où__n"/></e>
    <e lm="louzoù"><i>louz</i><par n="kel/où__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lunedoù"><i>luned</i><par n="kel/où__n"/></e>
    <e lm="greunavalenn"><par n="initial-g"/><i>reunavalenn</i><par n="muenn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rozenn"><i>rozenn</i><par n="muenn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="moualc’h"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ou</i><par n="mou/alc’h__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klujar"><par n="initial-k"/><i>luj</i><par n="kluj/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kobar"><par n="initial-k"/><i>ob</i><par n="kluj/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gar"><i/><par n="/gar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aotrou barner"><i>aotro</i><par n="aotro/u__n"/><p><l><b/>barner</l><r><g><b/>barner</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="aotrou enseller"><i>aotro</i><par n="aotro/u__n"/><p><l><b/>enseller</l><r><g><b/>enseller</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="aotrou maer"><i>aotro</i><par n="aotro/u__n"/><p><l><b/>maer</l><r><g><b/>maer</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="aotrou rektor"><i>aotro</i><par n="aotro/u__n"/><p><l><b/>rektor</l><r><g><b/>rektor</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="ti-embann"><par n="initial-t"/><i>i</i><par n="ti__n"/><p><l>-embann</l><r><g>-embann</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="ti-karter"><par n="initial-t"/><i>i</i><par n="ti__n"/><p><l>-karter</l><r><g>-karter</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="ti-krampouezh"><par n="initial-t"/><i>i</i><par n="ti__n"/><p><l>-krampouezh</l><r><g>-krampouezh</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="ti-lojañ miret"><par n="initial-t"/><i>i</i><par n="ti__n"/><p><l>-lojañ<b/>miret</l><r><g>-lojañ<b/>miret</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="ael"><i/><par n="/ael__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arar"><i/><par n="/arar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bazh"><par n="initial-b"/><i/><par n="b/azh__n"/></e>
	<e lm="bazh loaek"><par n="initial-b"/><i/><par n="b/azh__n"/><p><l>-loaek</l><r><g>-loaek</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="bazh skiañ"><par n="initial-b"/><i/><par n="b/azh__n"/><p><l><b/>skiañ</l><r><g><b/>skiañ</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="bazh taboulin"><par n="initial-b"/><i/><par n="b/azh__n"/><p><l><b/>taboulin</l><r><g><b/>taboulin</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="botez"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ot</i><par n="bot/ez__n"/></e>
	<e lm="botez ruzikat"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ot</i><par n="bot/ez__n"/><p><l><b/>ruzikat</l><r><g><b/>ruzikat</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="botez-koad"><par n="initial-b"/><i>i</i><par n="bot/ez__n"/><p><l>-koad</l><r><g>-koad</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="botez-ruilh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>i</i><par n="bot/ez__n"/><p><l>-ruilh</l><r><g>-ruilh</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="buoc’h"><par n="initial-b"/><i>uoc’h</i><par n="buoc’h__n"/></e>
	<e lm="buoc’h laezh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>uoc’h</i><par n="buoc’h__n"/><p><l><b/>laezh</l><r><g><b/>laezh</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="dañvad"><par n="initial-d"/><i/><par n="d/añvad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forc’h"><i>f</i><par n="f/orc’h__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gavr"><par n="initial-g"/><i/><par n="g/avr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwreg"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>r</i><par n="gwr/eg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kar"><par n="initial-k"/><i></i><par n="k/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kazeg"><par n="initial-k"/><i></i><par n="k/azeg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gaou"><par n="initial-g"/><i/><par n="kr/aou__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kraou"><par n="initial-k"/><i>r</i><par n="kr/aou__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kraou kezeg"><par n="initial-k"/><i>r</i><par n="kr/aou__n"/><p><l><b/>kezeg</l><r><g><b/>kezeg</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="kraou moc’h"><par n="initial-k"/><i>r</i><par n="kr/aou__n"/><p><l><b/>moc’h</l><r><g><b/>moc’h</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="manac’h"><par n="initial-m"/><i/><par n="m/anac’h__n"/></e>
    <e lm="matezh"><par n="initial-m"/><i/><par n="m/atezh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="planken"><par n="initial-p"/><i>l</i><par n="pl/anken__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pikerez"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ikerez</i><par n="muenn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="botez"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ot</i><par n="bot/ez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bigodez"><par n="initial-b"/><i>igodez</i><par n="muenn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="targazh"><par n="initial-t"/><i>arg</i><par n="b/azh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abad"><i>abad</i><par n="ti__n"/></e>
    <e lm="koailh"><par n="initial-k"/><i>oailh</i><par n="muenn__n"/></e>
